Tennessee, session 114, SB1696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-1801, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f) A public institution of education that provides an opportunity or benefit
exclusively to one (1) sex does not violate this section if the institution provides a
substantially similar or reasonably comparable opportunity or benefit to the opposite sex
through a different program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1696
010216
- 1 -